Montana, session 2025, HB668.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 23-5-119, MCA, is amended to read:
"23-5-119. Appropriate alcoholic beverage license for certain gambling activities. (1) Except as
provided in subsection (3), to be eligible to offer gambling under Title 23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or 6, an applicant
must own in the applicant's name:
(a) a retail all-beverages license issued under 16-4-201, but the owner of a license transferred
after July 1, 2007, pursuant to 16-4-204 is not eligible to offer gambling. Licenses issued under 16-4-201(8)(c)
after [the effective date of this act] may not offer gambling activities;.
(b) except as provided in subsection (1)(c), a license issued prior to October 1, 1997, under 16-4-
105, authorizing the sale of beer and wine for consumption on the licensed premises. Licenses issued under
16-4-105(1)(e) after [the effective date of this act] may not offer gambling activities;.
(c) a beer and wine license issued in an area outside of an incorporated city or town as provided in
16-4-105(1)(f). The owner of the license whose premises are situated outside of an incorporated city or town
may offer gambling, regardless of when the license was issued, if the owner and premises qualify under Title
23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or 6.
(d) a retail beer and wine license issued under 16-4-109;
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 668
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 668
(e) a resort retail all-beverages license issued under 16-4-213; or
(f) a retail all-beverages license issued under 16-4-208.
(2) For purposes of subsection (1)(b), a license issued under 16-4-105 prior to October 1, 1997,
may be transferred to a new owner or to a new location or transferred to a new owner and location by the
department of revenue pursuant to the applicable provisions of Title 16. The owner of the license that has been
transferred may offer gambling if the owner and the premises qualify under Title 23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or 6.
(3) Lessees of retail all-beverages licenses issued under 16-4-208 or beer and wine licenses
issued under 16-4-109 who have applied for and been granted a gambling operator's license under 23-5-177
are eligible to offer and may be granted permits for gambling authorized under Title 23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or
6.
(4) A license transferee or a qualified purchaser operating pending final approval under 16-4-433
who has been granted a gambling operator's license under 23-5-177 may be granted permits for gambling
under Title 23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or 6.
(5) A license issued under a competitive bidding process as provided in 16-4-430 is not eligible to
offer gambling under Title 23, chapter 5, part 3, 5, or 6."
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 668
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 668, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 668
INTRODUCED BY E. BUTTREY
AN ACT REVISING ALCOHOL LAWS TO PROHIBIT THE LICENSE OF AN ENLISTED PERSONS',
NONCOMMISSIONED OFFICERS', OR OFFICERS' CLUB LOCATED ON A STATE OR FEDERAL MILITARY
RESERVATION OR A POST OF A NATIONALLY CHARTERED VETERANS' ORGANIZATION OR A LODGE
OF A RECOGNIZED NATIONAL FRATERNAL ORGANIZATION FROM OFFERING GAMBLING AS PROVIDED
UNDER TITLE 23, CHAPTER 5, PARTS 3, 5, OR 6; AMENDING SECTION 23-5-119, MCA; AND PROVIDING
AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.”